Massachusetts, session 194th, H204.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 29 of Chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following paragraph:- Counsel under the
department shall meet on a quarterly basis with any child currently in the custody of the
department. The department shall provide official documentation, which shall be subject to
approval to any relevant commission, social worker, foster parent, or guardian to confirm the
validity of said quarterly meeting. Counsel shall present documentation prior to compensation
for said quarterly meetings.
of 1